Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-103.27
Original package, defined.

Original package means
any bottle, flask, jug, can, cask, barrel, keg, hogshead, or other receptacle
or container used, corked or capped, sealed, and labeled by the manufacturer
of alcoholic liquor to contain and to convey any alcoholic liquor.

Laws 2010, LB861, § 35.